intl/locales/or/hyphenation/hyph_or.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
2‍2
1‌1
ଅ1
ଆ1
ଇ1
ଈ1
ଉ1
ଊ1
ଋ1
ୠ1
ଌ1
ୡ1
ଏ1
ଐ1
ଓ1
ଔ1
ା1
ି1
ୀ1
ୁ1
ୂ1
ୃ1
େ1
ୈ1
ୋ1
ୌ1
1କ
1ଖ
1ଗ
1ଘ
1ଙ
1ଚ
1ଛ
1ଜ
1ଝ
1ଞ
1ଟ
1ଠ
1ଡ
1ଢ
1ଣ
1ତ
1ଥ
1ଦ
1ଧ
1ନ
1ପ
1ଫ
1ବ
1ଭ
1ମ
1ଯ
1ର
1ଲ
1ଳ
1ଵ
1ଶ
1ଷ
1ସ
1ହ
2ଂ1
2ଃ1
2ୗ1
2ଁ1
2୍2
